Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.511

Unlawful actions.

(1) It is unlawful for any person to:

(a) Interfere with or obstruct any person in the performance of official duties under this chapter;

(b) Employ a tester, sampler, weigher, grader, or pasteurizer who is not licensed as a dairy technician;

(c) Alter or tamper with a seal placed by the director;

(d) Alter or tamper with a sample of milk or milk products taken or sealed by the director; or

(e) Operate as a milk producer or milk processing plant without obtaining a license from the director.

(2) Except as provided under RCW 15.36.131, it is unlawful for a milk processing plant to accept milk from a person not licensed as a producer or milk processor.

[ 2006 c 157 s 4; 1999 c 291 s 24; 1961 c 11 s 15.32.730. Prior: 1919 c 192 s 76; RRS s 6238. Formerly RCW 15.32.730.]

NOTES:

Findings—2006 c 157: See note following RCW 15.36.012.